New Jersey, session 222, S1183.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  The Legislature finds and declares that the use of electric bicycles and electric scooters as a mode of transportation is increasing in popularity in this State.  The increased prevalence of electric bicycles and electric scooters has corresponded with an increase in injuries to its users.  Crash testing indicates that the risk of serious head injury is greater when operating an electric bicycle or electric scooter than when operating a traditional bicycle.  The absence of mandatory helmet use has been identified as a significant factor contributing to the severity of injuries resulting from a crash.  The Legislature, therefore, determines that it is in the public interest to require the use of a helmet when operating an electric bicycle or scooter. b.    A person shall not operate or ride upon a low-speed electric bicycle or low-speed electric scooter, as defined in R.S.39:1-1, unless that person is wearing a properly fitted and fastened bicycle helmet that is in accordance with the standards for bicycle helmets set forth in section 1 of P.L.1991, c.465 (C.39:4-10.1).  This requirement shall apply to a person who rides upon a low-speed electric bicycle or low-speed electric scooter while in a restraining seat that is attached to and towed by the low-speed electric bicycle or low-speed electric scooter. c.     A person who violates the provisions of this section shall be fined a maximum of $25 for a first offense and a maximum of $100 for any subsequent offense. 2.    This act shall take effect on the first day of the fourth month next following enactment.